Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1983, 1990, 2002, 2012, and 2020 to make other minor changes.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, that provides an extension of certain deadlines under this chapter until July 15, 2020, see § 11, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For revenue regulations, see 15 AAC.